Tennessee, session 114, HB1150.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-50-814(a), is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
( ) "Adoption" includes that period of time beginning with the filing of an adoption
petition and the initial placement of a minor child within the residence of a prospective
adoptive parent pursuant to a court-ordered parental power of attorney or guardianship
or custodial order until the issuance of a final order of adoption by the court;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1150
000595
- 1 -